Washington statutes.
RCW 42.52.100

Conditions on appearance before state agencies or doing business with the state—Hearing—Judicial review.

(1) The head of an agency, upon finding that any former state officer or state employee of such agency or any other person has violated any provision of this chapter or rules adopted under it, may, in addition to any other powers the head of such agency may have, bar or impose reasonable conditions upon:

(a) The appearance before such agency of such former state officer or state employee or other person; and

(b) The conduct of, or negotiation or competition for, business with such agency by such former state officer or state employee or other person, such period of time as may reasonably be necessary or appropriate to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

(2) Findings of violations referred to in subsection (1)(b) of this section shall be made on record after notice and hearing, conducted in accordance with the Washington Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 34.05 RCW. Such findings and orders are subject to judicial review.

(3) This section does not apply to the legislative or judicial branches of government.

[ 1994 c 154 s 110; 1969 ex.s. c 234 s 27. Formerly RCW 42.18.270.]